District of Columbia statutes.
31-5320

Taxation.

Every society organized or licensed under this chapter is hereby declared to be a charitable and benevolent institution, and all of its funds shall be exempt from all and every state, county, district, municipal and school tax other than taxes on real estate and office equipment.

History

Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 1221, 45 DCR 1172

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-1250.